src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@koonduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘oonduv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@koormav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘oormav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@koosnev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘oosnev MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
koostatav+A:k˘oostatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kootav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘ootav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@korduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘orduv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
korisev+A:korisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
korraldatav+A:korraldatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
korraldav+A:korraldav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
korrutatav+A:korrutatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kortsuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘ortsuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kosutav+A:kosutav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kraaksuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kr˘aaksuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
krabisev+A:krabisev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kriiskav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kr˘iiskav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kritiseeritav+A:kritiseeritav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kritiseeriv+A:kritis˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
krõbisev+A:krõbisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuhjuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uhjuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuivav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uivav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uiv%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 7 " ; 
kujundav+A:kujundav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kujunev+A:kujunev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kujutav+A:kujutav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kujuteldav+A:kujut˘eldav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kujutletav+A:kujutletav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kukkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘ukkuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kulgev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘ulgev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuluv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kuluv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kumav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kumav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kumerduv+A:kumerduv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kumisev+A:kumisev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kummastav+A:kummastav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kurnav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘urnav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kusev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kusev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kustuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘ustuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kutsutav+A:kutsutav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kutsuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘utsuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuldav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uuldav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
kuulutav+A:kuulutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuluv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uuluv MAGUS  "weight: 6 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuumav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uumav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kõdunev+A:kõdunev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kõhklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘õhklev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kõikuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘õikuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kõlav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kõlav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
kõlisev+A:kõlisev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kõndiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘õnʲdiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kõnelev+A:kõnelev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
kõrgenev+A:kõrgenev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kõrguv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘õrguv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kõrvaldatav+A:kõrvaldatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kõrvetav+A:kõrvetav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kähisev+A:kähisev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@käibiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘äibiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@käidav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘äidav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@käiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘äiv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
käivituv+A:käivituv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
käratsev+A:käratsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kärisev+A:kärisev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
käsitletav+A:käsitletav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
käsitlev+A:käsitlev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@käskiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘äsʲkiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kääriv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘ääriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@köetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘öetav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kükitav+A:kükitav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@külgnev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘ülʲgnev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
külmetav+A:külmetav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
küpsetav+A:küpsetav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
küsitav+A:küsitav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
küsitletav+A:küsitletav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@küsiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@küsiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kütkestav+A:kütkestav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@küündiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘üündiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@küütlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘üütlev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@laastav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘aastav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@laekuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘aekuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
laevatatav+A:laevatatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
lagundav+A:lagundav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
lagunev+A:lagunev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
lahendatav+A:lahendatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lahknev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ahknev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lahkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ahkuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
lahustuv+A:lahustuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
lahutatav+A:lahutatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
laidetav+A:laidetav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@laimav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘aimav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@laiuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘aiuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lamav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@lamav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
lammutav+A:lammutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@langev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘angev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
laristav+A:laristav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@laskuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘askuv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lauldav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘auldav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
laveeriv+A:lav˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lebav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@lebav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
leegitsev+A:leegitsev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@leekiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘eekiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
leemendav+A:leemendav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
leemetav+A:leemetav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lehkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ehkav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lehviv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ehviv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@leiduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘eiduv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lendav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘endav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@leppiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘eppiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
levitatav+A:levitatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
levitav+A:levitav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@leviv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@leviv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
libisev+A:libisev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
lidutav+A:lidutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lihav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@lihav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lihviv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ihviv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@liialdav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@liialdav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@liibuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘iibuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
liidetav+A:liidetav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
liigutav+A:liigutav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@liikuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘iikuv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@liipav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘iipav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@liituv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘iituv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
lipitsev+A:lipitsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lirtsuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘irtsuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lodev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@lodev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@loetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘oetav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
logisev+A:logisev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
lohisev+A:lohisev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
lohutav+A:lohutav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lokkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘okkav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@loksuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘oksuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lonkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘onkav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@loodav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘oodav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
loodetav+A:loodetav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@loojuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘oojuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@looklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ooklev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@loov+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘oov MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
lotendav+A:lotendav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
lubatav+A:lubatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lubav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@lubav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lummav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ummav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@luurav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘uurav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõhkev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õhkev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõhnav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õhnav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõikav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õikav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõkendav+A:lõkendav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõpetav+A:lõpetav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
